North Carolina, session 2025, SB748.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Part 1 of Article 8 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-81.77. Critical thinking.
The standard course of study shall include that the public schools provide instruction in
critical thinking in kindergarten through grade five so that students can learn to evaluate
information rather than simply memorize it."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
*S748-v-1*